Mississippi statutes. Title 51. Waters, Water Resources, Water Districts, Drainage, and Flood Control
In General
§ 51-7-35.
Additional and existing districts.

After the organization of a master water management district, no additional drainage or water management districts shall be organized so as to include any of the area within the boundaries of the master water management district, except with the consent of the master water management district.

Existing drainage or water management districts are hereby authorized to petition the chancery court and, with its approval and the consent of the master water management district, to convey without consideration to the master water management district lands, easements, or rights of way that are to be used by the master water management district for any of the purposes of such district upon the condition that the master water management district assumes the responsibility for maintaining the works of improvement on such lands, easements, or rights of way. Such existing districts are further authorized to petition the chancery court and, upon its approval and with the consent of the master water management district, to transfer to the master water management district the responsibility for operation and maintenance of any pre-existing works of improvement that are not included in the plans for the project under said Public Law 566, or other law of the United States.

Financial obligations of existing drainage or water management districts shall not be affected or impaired by the creation of a master water management district or by the transfer to such district by any drainage or water management district of lands, easements, or rights of way as herein provided; nor shall any liens upon the lands of any drainage or water management district be impaired by the creation of any master water management district.

Powers of existing drainage or water management districts shall not be affected by the creation of any master water management district, except with respect to works of improvement included in the plans for the project under said Public Law 566, or other law of the United States.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5956-111; Laws, 1960, ch. 175, § 11, eff from and after passage (approved May 10, 1960).

§ 51-7-37.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1980, ch. 440, § 28, eff from and after January 1, 1981.

[Codes, 1942, § 5956-112; Laws, 1960, ch. 175, § 12; Laws, 1966, ch. 270, § 5]

§ 51-7-39.
Liability of commissioners.

No member of any board of commissioners of any master water management district shall be liable for any damages sustained by any one in the prosecution of the work under his charge, unless it shall be made to appear that he has acted with a corrupt and malicious intent.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5956-113; Laws, 1960, ch. 175, § 13, eff from and after passage (approved May 10, 1960).

§ 51-7-41.
Requirements for dissolution.

Any master water management district which has no unmatured bonded indebtedness, and which has constructed no works of improvement or projects as set forth herein or which has completed all purposes for which it was created, may be dissolved by the chancery court which organized said district in the manner hereinafter provided, but the proceedings for its dissolution shall not be commenced within three years after the date of organization of such district.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5956-114; Laws, 1960, ch. 175, § 14, eff from and after passage (approved May 10, 1960).

§ 51-7-43.
Dissolution procedure.

Whenever, after the expiration of the said period of three years, twenty-five landowners of any such district, or a majority of the landowners of any such district, excluding lands owned by the state, or any landowner or owners owning more than fifty percent (50%) of the total acreage of said district, excluding acreage owned by the state, shall sign and file with the clerk of the chancery court by which such district was organized a petition for the dissolution of such district, it shall be the duty of such clerk to give notice in the manner provided in Section 51-7-11 that a hearing will be held on such petition to dissolve such district. Such notice shall set the time and place in term time or vacation when the court shall consider said petition, and such notice shall command all interested persons to appear and show cause, if any they can, as to why such district should or should not be dissolved.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5956-114; Laws, 1960, ch. 175, § 14, eff from and after passage (approved May 10, 1960).

§ 51-7-45.
Dissolution hearing and order.

On hearing, the chancery court shall hear the cause in the same manner as other causes in chancery, and shall dissolve or refuse to dissolve said district as shall appear in the best interests of the landowners, and shall enter an order accordingly. If an order of dissolution is entered, the court shall decree that no further expenses shall be incurred by the district, and all papers, records and documents of the district shall be deposited with the chancery court by the commissioners within fifteen days after said order. Costs of the dissolution proceeding in event of dissolution, including solicitors fees as might be allowed by the court, shall be assessed and taxed by the court to be collected in the same manner as other taxes and assessments of the district; but in event the district is not dissolved, all costs including solicitors fees shall be assessed against the petitioners.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5956-114; Laws, 1960, ch. 175, § 14, eff from and after passage (approved May 10, 1960).

§ 51-7-47.
Outstanding claims.

Upon dissolution all powers of the district and its commissioners shall cease, except that any just claim, contract, or obligation shall not be impaired, and persons holding such claims shall, on notice of the dissolution as provided herein, file any such claim as they may have in the court; and the chancery court shall, upon the hearing for dissolution, pass upon such claims and order any assessment or levy as provided for other assessments to pay such claim in the event same shall be found justified, due, and owing by the district.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5956-114; Laws, 1960, ch. 175, § 14, eff from and after passage (approved May 10, 1960).

§ 51-7-49.
Transfer of surplus funds of drainage districts.

Any drainage district organized under any laws of the State of Mississippi is hereby authorized to transfer to any master water management district created under this chapter, within which such drainage district is located, any surplus funds of such drainage district to be used for any lawful purpose for which such master water management district is authorized to use funds, including but not being limited to the payment of any costs incurred for engineering work, legal services, costs of publication and other administrative expenses, and any other necessary preliminary expenses.

The transfer of such funds is authorized to be made, in the discretion of the commissioners of any such drainage district involved, after the appointment, as provided by law, of commissioners for any such master water management district.

No funds shall be transferred under the provisions of this section that are needed and required to pay and retire bonds and interest due and owing by such district, or needed and required to pay debts and obligations previously incurred by said district and unpaid. If any part of such districts so transferring such funds is not embraced in the new master water management district, then such transferring district shall retain such funds as may be needed and necessary to service that part of said district not embraced in the master water management district.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5956-121; Laws, 1962, ch. 161, §§ 1-4.